Washington statutes.
RCW 19.108.040

Award of attorney's fees.

If a claim of misappropriation is made in bad faith, a motion to terminate an injunction is made or resisted in bad faith, or wilful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the prevailing party.

[ 1981 c 286 s 4.]